Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 56

Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013

9-4-5601. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 1; 2013, ch. 243, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

9-4-5602. Implementation of system of strategic planning, performance measures, and performance review.

The general assembly finds and declares that accountability in program performance is vital to effective and efficient delivery of governmental services, and to maintain public confidence and trust in government. To maximize accountability, a system of strategic planning, program performance measures, and performance audits should be implemented to measure the effectiveness and efficiency of governmental services. It is of paramount public importance that this system encourages full and candid participation by all agencies of state government. This system will generate information necessary to inform the public fully and for the general assembly to make meaningful decisions about the allocation of scarce resources in meeting vital needs.

Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 1; 2013, ch. 243, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

9-4-5603. Application.

The strategic planning, program performance measures, and performance review requirements of this part shall apply to all agencies unless exempted in this part or exempted by the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 1; 2013, ch. 243, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

9-4-5604. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency” or “state agency” means any unit organization of the executive department, including any official, department, board, commission, division, bureau, section, district, office, authority, committee, or council or any other unit of state government, however designated, including, without limitation, higher education. For purposes of this part, “agency” or “state agency” shall not include the governor's office, the judicial department, the comptroller of the treasury state treasurer, secretary of state, attorney general and reporter or the legislative department. For purposes of this part, “judicial department” means the court system, district attorneys general conference, district public defenders conference, and the office of post-conviction defender;

“Baseline data” means indicators of a state agency's current performance level, pursuant to guidelines established by the commissioner of finance and administration;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of finance and administration;

“Outcome” means an indicator of the actual impact or public benefit of a program;

“Output” means the actual service or product delivered by a state agency;

“Performance measure” means a quantitative or qualitative indicator used to assess state agency performance, including outcome and output indicators;

“Program” means a set of activities undertaken in accordance with a plan of action organized to realize identifiable goals and objectives. These activities are chosen by the department of finance and administration in consultation with the agency or state agency to be measured in order to support the overall goals and objectives of the department; and

“Standard” means the desired level of performance of a program, measured by outcome or output.

Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 1; 2013, ch. 243, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

9-4-5605. Legislative intent.

It is the legislative intent that the requirements of this part constitute a new approach to measuring the strategic functions and operations of each department in order for the state government to operate more efficiently and effectively.

The comptroller of the treasury shall have authority to employ outside consultants and entities with expertise in governmental finance and performance review for the purpose of conducting performance reviews or otherwise fulfilling the comptroller's duties under this part. The performance reviews required under this part may be conducted by a private entity selected by the comptroller, subject to the competitive bidding requirements of title 12, chapter 4.

Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 1; 2013, ch. 243, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

9-4-5606. Development of performance measures and standards — Submission of strategic plan and proposed performance measures and standards.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall annually issue instructions for the strategic plans and for the development of performance measures and standards for each program.

By August 15 of each year, each state agency subject to this part is required to submit to the commissioner of finance and administration, in a form to be specified by the commissioner, a draft strategic plan and proposed performance measures and standards for each program. Such state agencies shall also identify the outputs or outcomes produced by each program, baseline data associated with each performance measure, and performance standards. Performance measures and standards shall be reviewed by the commissioner of finance and administration and revised as deemed necessary by the commissioner of finance and administration.

Each state agency subject to this part shall submit to the commissioner of finance and administration any documentation required by the commissioner regarding the validity, reliability, and appropriateness of each performance measure and standard and regarding how the strategic plan and the performance measures are used in management decision-making and other agency processes.

Annually, at a time to be determined by the commissioner of finance and administration after the general appropriations act becomes law, state agencies may submit to the commissioner any adjustments to their performance measures and standards based on the amounts appropriated for each program by the general assembly. The chairs of the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives may request updated performance measures based on the increase or decrease of appropriations in the given year.

At any time during the fiscal year in which a state agency, by restraining order, injunction, consent decree, settlement, or any final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction, or by law or executive order, is required to modify its operations, or the state agency receives additional federal or other funding, the state agency may submit to the commissioner of finance and administration any necessary adjustments to its performance measures and standards.

When an adjustment is made pursuant to subdivisions (d)(1) and (2), all performance measures and standards, including any adjustments made, shall be submitted to and reviewed and revised as necessary by the commissioner of finance and administration. The commissioner shall maintain the official record of adjustments to the performance measures and standards and shall update the reports accordingly. Programs that have been eliminated or added from the report in a given year shall be indicated in the annual report or when the report is updated.

Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 1; 2013, ch. 243, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

9-4-5607. [Reserved.]

The commissioner of finance and administration shall evaluate at least annually each state agency's strategic plan and program performance measures. When necessary the commissioner of finance and administration shall update each state agency's strategic plan and program performance measures. Such updates shall include comments from the state agency when necessary to explain how the program is performing.

The commissioner of finance and administration may make recommendations to the governor and the finance, ways, and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives concerning the following nonexhaustive performance measure incentives or disincentives for potential inclusion in the appropriations bill:

Incentives may include, but are not limited to:

Additional flexibility in budget management;

Additional flexibility in salary rate and position management, notwithstanding title 8, chapter 23, or any other law to the contrary;

Retention of up to fifty percent (50%) of unexpended and unencumbered balances of appropriations, excluding special categories and grants in aid, that may be used for nonrecurring purposes including, but not limited to, lump-sum bonuses, employee training, or productivity enhancements, including technology and other improvements; and

Additional funds to be used for, but not limited to, lump-sum bonuses, employee training, or productivity enhancements, including technology and other improvements;

Disincentives may include, but are not limited to:

Mandatory quarterly reports to the governor on the agency's progress in meeting performance standards;

Mandatory quarterly appearances before the governor to report on the agency's progress in meeting performance standards;

Elimination or restructuring of the program, which may include, but not be limited to, transfer of the program or outsourcing all or a portion of the program;

Reduction of total positions for a program;

Restriction on or reduction of the appropriation for the program; and

Reduction of managerial salaries, notwithstanding the requirements of title 8, chapter 23, or any other law to the contrary.

Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 1; 2013, ch. 243, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

9-4-5609. Preparation of strategic plan.

Beginning August 15, 2013, and each year thereafter, each state agency subject to this part, shall submit a draft strategic plan and the agency's programs chosen for the program performance measures to the department of finance and administration for review, modification, and approval. Each strategic plan and program performance plan shall be submitted to the general assembly and the governor not later than September 30 of each year and shall cover the fiscal year in effect as of the date of the report.

The programs report shall include, but not be limited to, the following matters:

A clear statement of the purpose for each program;

A description of the program, when such information is needed to explain the program;

The funding amount of each program, when such information is identifiable by agency;

The outcomes or outputs produced by each program; and

The historical trends of outputs or outcomes of the program, when such information is available.

The Tennessee higher education commission shall submit to the commissioner of finance and administration a single strategic plan, with the advice of the University of Tennessee, the state university and community college system, and the Tennessee student assistance corporation.

The comptroller of the treasury, state treasurer, secretary of state, and attorney general and reporter shall prepare their strategic plans separately.

The administrative office of the courts shall prepare a strategic plan separately on behalf of the court system. Such plan shall include the court system, the district attorneys general conference, the district public defenders conference, and the office of post-conviction defender.

The joint legislative services committee shall prepare a strategic plan separately on behalf of the legislative department.

Each strategic plan shall be submitted to the general assembly and the governor not later than September 30 of each year and shall cover the fiscal year in effect as of the date of the report.

Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 1; 2013, ch. 243, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

9-4-5610. Performance review.

Each state agency shall be subject to a performance review of its activities by the comptroller of the treasury.

The performance review shall include such matters as the comptroller of the treasury deems appropriate related to the manner in which the entity is delivering its services and achieving its objectives, including but not limited to:

The efficient use of all state and federal resources and user fees;

Additional non-state revenue or cost savings that the entity could achieve; and

The extent to which the entity has achieved the objectives of its strategic plan.

Each entity subject to a performance review shall cooperate fully with the comptroller of the treasury and shall timely provide all relevant documents and requested information. If any entity refuses to provide any requested documents or information, the comptroller shall include such refusal in its report, as well as the reasons given by the entity for not furnishing the documents or information.

Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 1.

9-4-5611. Admissibility of information in judicial proceeding or administrative hearing.

Notwithstanding subsection (c), to achieve full and candid participation in the planning and audit process, no strategic plan or performance review, or any information generated solely for or by any such plan or review, shall be admissible in any judicial proceeding or administrative hearing.

Any documents or information referenced in any such plan or audit that exist independently of the planning and review process shall not be subject to the prohibition of subsection (a). The admissibility of such documents and information shall be determined in accordance with the rules of evidence and standards otherwise applicable to any such proceeding.

Each strategic plan and performance review shall be a public record under title 10, chapter 7.

Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 1.

9-4-5612. Proposed instructions for the development of performance measures for the legislature.

The director of the office of legislative administration shall develop and submit to the joint legislative services committee proposed instructions for the development of performance measures for the legislative department. The joint legislative services committee shall review such proposed instructions, may revise or amend the proposed instructions, and shall adopt final instructions for the development of such performance measures.

Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 1; 2013, ch. 243, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

Chapters 5–7

[Reserved]